Hawaii statutes.
§92F-19 Limitations on disclosure of
government records to other agencies. (a) No agency may disclose or
authorize disclosure of government records to any other agency unless the
disclosure is:

(1) Necessary for the performance of the requesting
agency's duties and functions and is also:

(A) Compatible with the purpose for which the
information was collected or obtained; or

(B) Consistent with the conditions or
reasonable expectations of use and disclosure under which the information was
provided;

(2) To the state archives for the purposes of
historical preservation, administrative maintenance, or destruction;

(3) To another agency, another state, or the federal
government, or foreign law enforcement agency or authority, if the disclosure
is:

(A) For the purpose of a civil or criminal
law enforcement activity authorized by law; and

(B) Pursuant to:

(i) A written agreement or written request, or

(ii) A verbal request, made under exigent
circumstances, by an officer or employee of the requesting agency whose
identity has been verified, provided that such request is promptly confirmed in
writing;

(4) To a criminal law enforcement agency of this
State, another state, or the federal government, or a foreign criminal law
enforcement agency or authority, if the information is limited to an
individual's name and other identifying particulars, including present and past
places of employment;

(5) To a foreign government pursuant to an executive
agreement, compact, treaty, or statute;

(6) To the legislature, or a county council, or any
committee or subcommittee thereof;

(7) Pursuant to an order of a court of competent
jurisdiction;

(8) To authorized officials of another agency,
another state, or the federal government for the purpose of auditing or
monitoring an agency program that receives federal, state, or county funding;

(9) To the offices of the legislative auditor, the
legislative reference bureau, or the ombudsman of this State for the
performance of their respective functions;

(10) To the department of human resources development,
county personnel agencies, or line agency personnel offices for the performance
of their respective duties and functions, including employee recruitment and
examination, classification and compensation reviews, the administration and
auditing of personnel transactions, the administration of training and safety,
workers' compensation, and employee benefits and assistance programs, and for
labor relations purposes; or

(11) Otherwise subject to disclosure under this
chapter.

(b) An agency receiving government records
pursuant to subsection (a) shall be subject to the same restrictions on
disclosure of the records as the originating agency. [L 1988, c 262, pt of §1;
am L 1993, c 250, §2; am L 1994, c 56, §21]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next